Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1806
Jurisdictional utilities; filings required.

Every jurisdictional utility shall publish and file with the commission copies of all schedules of rates and shall furnish the commission copies of all terms and conditions of service and contracts between jurisdictional utilities pertaining to any and all jurisdictional services to be rendered by such jurisdictional utilities. The commission may adopt and promulgate reasonable rules and regulations regarding the form and filing of all schedules of rates and all rules and regulations of such jurisdictional utility, including such protection of confidentiality as requested by the jurisdictional utility, and the jurisdictional utility's suppliers and ratepayers, for contracts entered into by them, and as the commission determines reasonable and appropriate.

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 6.